Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-2104
Learning community coordinating council; powers.

A learning community coordinating council shall have the authority to:

(1) For fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2017-18, levy a common levy for the general funds of member school districts pursuant to sections 77-3442 and 79-1073;

(2) Levy for leasing or purchasing elementary learning center facilities, for remodeling elementary learning center facilities, and for up to fifty percent of the estimated cost for focus school or program capital projects approved by the learning community coordinating council pursuant to subdivision (2)(f) of section 77-3442 and section 79-2111;

(3) Levy for early childhood education programs for children in poverty, for elementary learning center employees, for contracts with other entities or individuals who are not employees of the learning community for elementary learning center programs and services, and for pilot projects pursuant to subdivision (2)(g) of section 77-3442, except that not more than ten percent of such levy may be used for administrative staff of the learning community;

(4) Develop, submit, administer, and evaluate community achievement plans in collaboration with the advisory committee, educational service units serving member school districts, member school districts, and the student achievement coordinator or other department staff designated by the Commissioner of Education;

(5) Collect, analyze, and report data and information, including, but not limited to, information provided by a school district pursuant to subsection (5) of section 79-201;

(6) Approve focus schools and focus programs to be operated by member school districts;

(7) Adopt, approve, and implement a diversity plan pursuant to sections 79-2110 and 79-2118;

(8) Through school year 2016-17, administer the open enrollment provisions in section 79-2110 for the learning community as part of a diversity plan developed by the council to provide educational opportunities which will result in increased diversity in schools across the learning community;

(9) Annually conduct school fairs to provide students and parents the opportunity to explore the educational opportunities available at each school in the learning community and develop other methods for encouraging access to such information and promotional materials;

(10) Develop procedures for determining best practices for addressing student achievement barriers and for disseminating such practices within the learning community and to other school districts;

(11) Partner with public and private entities to support increasing high school graduation rates;

(12) Establish and administer elementary learning centers through achievement subcouncils pursuant to sections 79-2112 to 79-2114;

(13) Administer the learning community funds distributed to the learning community pursuant to section 79-2111;

(14) Establish a procedure for receiving community input and complaints regarding the learning community;

(15) Establish a procedure to assist parents, citizens, and member school districts in accessing an approved center pursuant to the Dispute Resolution Act to resolve disputes involving member school districts or the learning community. Such procedure may include payment by the learning community for some mediation services;

(16) Establish and administer pilot projects related to enhancing the academic achievement of elementary students, particularly students who face challenges in the educational environment due to factors such as poverty, limited English skills, and mobility;

(17) Provide funding to public or private entities engaged in the juvenile justice system providing prefiling and diversion programming designed to reduce excessive absenteeism and unnecessary involvement with the juvenile justice system; and

(18) Hold public hearings at its discretion in response to issues raised by residents regarding the learning community, a member school district, and academic achievement.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 106;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 40;

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB392, § 16;

Laws 2010, LB1070, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB463, § 20;

Laws 2013, LB585, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 61;

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB924, § 2.
July 18, 2026
Dispute Resolution Act, see section 25-2901.